Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201649-1464
Campaign statements
of committees; where filed.

The campaign statement of any committee, including a candidate
committee, a ballot question committee, or a political party committee, shall
be filed with the commission.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 64;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 587, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 16.